Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-547
Transportation of gas; operation of pipeline facilities; violations; district court; jurisdiction.

(1) The district courts shall have jurisdiction to restrain violations of sections 81-503, 81-505, 81-525, and 81-542 to 81-552, including the restraint of transportation of gas or the operation of a pipeline facility, or to enforce standards established under the Nebraska Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1969 upon petition by the Attorney General on behalf of the State of Nebraska.

(2) Actions under subsection (1) of this section and section 81-546 shall be brought in the county in the State of Nebraska in which the defendant's principal place of business is located, and process in such cases may be served in any other county in the State of Nebraska where the defendant may be found or in which the defendant is an inhabitant or transacts business.

Laws 1969, c. 763, § 6, p. 2888;

Laws 2024, LB1069, § 5.